District of Columbia statutes.
34-1256.03

Indemnification of the District.

(a)

A cable operator shall, at its sole cost and expense, indemnify and hold harmless the District, its officers, elected officials, agents, contractors, and employees against all claims, suits, causes of action, proceedings, judgments for damage arising out of the cable system under the franchise.

(b)

Failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section, or with the indemnification provisions in the franchise agreement, shall constitute a material breach of the franchise. The procedures to follow in the event of a material breach may be set forth in the franchise agreement.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 603
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334